tr: Ralli yarış sınıfı: Grup A; Grup B (tarihi); Grup N; Tırmanma rallisi; Tarihi; Açık/Modifiyeli; Rally2 (R5); Rally3; Rally4 (R2); Rally5 (R1); S2000; Safari spesifikasyonu; WRC (Rally1); Diğer
sk-SK: Trieda rally súťaží: Skupina A; Skupina B (historická); Skupina N; Preteky do vrchu; Historická; Otvorená/upravená; Rally2 (R5); Rally3; Rally4 (R2); Rally5 (R1); S2000; Špecifikácia Safari; WRC (Rally1); Iné
de: Rallye-Wettbewerbsklasse: Gruppe A; Gruppe B (historisch); Gruppe N; Bergrennen; Historisch; Offen/Modifiziert; Rally2 (R5); Rally3; Rally4 (R2); Rally5 (R1); S2000; Safari-Spezifikation; WRC (Rally1); Sonstige
lt-LT: Ralio varžybų klasė: A grupė; B grupė (istorinė); N grupė; Kalnų ralis; Istorinis; Atviroji / modifikuota; Rally2 (R5); Rally3; Rally4 (R2); Rally5 (R1); S2000; Safario specifikacija; WRC (Rally1); Kita
fi: Rallikilpailun luokka: A-ryhmä; B-ryhmä (historiallinen); N-ryhmä; Mäkinousuralli; Historiallinen; Avoin/muokattu; Rally2 (R5); Rally3; Rally4 (R2); Rally5 (R1); S2000; Safari-luokitus; WRC (Rally1); Muu
zh-CN: 拉力赛竞技组别: A 组; B 组（历史经典）; N 组; 爬山拉力赛; 历史经典赛事; 开放/改装组; Rally2 (R5); Rally3; Rally4 (R2); Rally5 (R1); S2000; 萨法里规格; WRC (Rally1); 其他
sv: Rallytävlingsklass: Grupp A; Grupp B (historisk); Grupp N; Backrally; Historisk; Öppen/modifierad; Rally2 (R5); Rally3; Rally4 (R2); Rally5 (R1); S2000; Safarispecifikation; WRC (Rally1); Övrigt
pl: Klasa zawodów rajdowych: Grupa A; Grupa B (historyczna); Grupa N; Rajd górski; Historyczna; Otwarta/Modyfikowana; Rally2 (R5); Rally3; Rally4 (R2); Rally5 (R1); S2000; Specyfikacja Safari; WRC (Rally1); Inne
en: Rally competition class: Group A; Group B (historic); Group N; Hillclimb rally; Historic; Open/Modified; Rally2 (R5); Rally3; Rally4 (R2); Rally5 (R1); S2000; Safari specification; WRC (Rally1); Other
it: Classe di competizione rally: Gruppo A; Gruppo B (storico); Gruppo N; Rally in salita; Storico; Open/Modificata; Rally2 (R5); Rally3; Rally4 (R2); Rally5 (R1); S2000; Specifiche Safari; WRC (Rally1); Altro
ko: 랠리 경기 클래스: 그룹 A; 그룹 B(클래식); 그룹 N; 힐클라임 랠리; 히스토릭; 오픈/개조형; 랠리2(R5); 랠리3; 랠리4(R2); 랠리5(R1); S2000; 사파리 사양; WRC(랠리1); 기타
pt-PT: Categoria da competição de rali: Grupo A; Grupo B (histórico); Grupo N; Rali de montanha; Histórico; Aberto/modificado; Rally2 (R5); Rally3; Rally4 (R2); Rally5 (R1); S2000; Especificação Safari; WRC (Rally1); Outro
es: Clase de competición de rally: Grupo A; Grupo B (histórico); Grupo N; Rally de montaña; Histórico; Abierto/Modificado; Rally2 (R5); Rally3; Rally4 (R2); Rally5 (R1); S2000; Especificación Safari; WRC (Rally1); Otro
fr: Catégorie de compétition de rallye: Groupe A; Groupe B (historique); Groupe N; Rallye de côte; Historique; Ouvert/modifié; Rally2 (R5); Rally3; Rally4 (R2); Rally5 (R1); S2000; Spécification Safari; WRC (Rally1); Autre
ja: ラリー競技クラス: Group A; グループB (ヒストリック); Group N; ヒルクライムラリー; ヒストリック; オープン/モディファイド; Rally2 (R5); Rally3; Rally4 (R2); Rally5 (R1); S2000; サファリ仕様; WRC (Rally1); その他
hu: Raliversenyzési osztály: A csoport; B csoport (történelmi); N csoport; Hegyi rali; Historic; Nyílt/Módosított; Rally2 (R5); Rally3; Rally4 (R2); Rally5 (R1); S2000; Szafari specifikáció; WRC (Rally1); Egyéb
nb: Rallykonkurranseklasse: Gruppe A; Gruppe B (historisk); Gruppe N; Bakkeklatringsrally; Historisk; Åpen/modifisert; Rally2 (R5); Rally3; Rally4 (R2); Rally5 (R1); S2000; Safarispesifikasjon; WRC (Rally1); Annet
cs: Třída rallyových soutěží: Skupina A; Skupina B (historické); Skupina N; Rallye do vrchu; Historické; Open / upravené; Rally2 (R5); Rally3; Rally4 (R2); Rally5 (R1); S2000; Specifikace pro Safari; WRC (Rally1); Ostatní
da: Rallykonkurrenceklasse: Gruppe A; Gruppe B (historisk); Gruppe N; Hillclimb-rally; Historisk; Åben/modificeret; Rally2 (R5); Rally3; Rally4 (R2); Rally5 (R1); S2000; Safari-specifikation; WRC (Rally1); Andet
th: การแข่งขันแรลลี่: Group A; Group B (คลาสสิก); Group N; แรลลีไต่เขา; รถคลาสสิก; แบบโอเพ่น/ปรับแต่ง; Rally2 (R5); Rally3; Rally4 (R2); Rally5 (R1); S2000; สเปคซาฟารี; WRC (Rally1); อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Razred reli natjecanja: Grupa A; Grupa B (povijesna); Grupa N; Brdski reli; Povijesna; Otvorena/Modificirana; Rally2 (R5); Rally3; Rally4 (R2); Rally5 (R1); S2000; Safari specifikacija; WRC (Rally1); Ostalo
zh-TW: 拉力賽競爭級別: A 組; B 組 (歷史); N 組; 爬山拉力賽; 歷史組; 開放組/改裝組; Rally2 (R5); Rally3; Rally4 (R2); Rally5 (R1); S2000; Safari 規格; WRC (Rally1); 其他
sl-SI: Tekmovalni razred za reli: Skupina A; Skupina B (zgodovinska); Skupina N; Gorski reli; Zgodovinski; Odprto/modificirano; Rally2 (R5); Rally3; Rally4 (R2); Rally5 (R1); S2000; Safari specifikacija; WRC (Rally1); Drugo
nl: Rally wedstrijdklasse: Groep A; Groep B (historisch); Groep N; Heuvelklim-rally; Historisch; Open/aangepast; Rally2 (R5); Rally3; Rally4 (R2); Rally5 (R1); S2000; Safari-specificatie; WRC (Rally1); Overig
ru: Класс раллийных соревнований: Группа A; Группа B (историческая); Группа N; Хиллклаймб ралли; Исторический; Открытый/Модифицированный; Rally2 (R5); Rally3; Rally4 (R2); Rally5 (R1); S2000; Спецификация Safari; WRC (Rally1); Другое
pt-BR: Rally competição classe: Grupo A; Grupo B (histórico); Grupo N; Rali de subida de montanha; Histórico; Aberto/modificado; Rally2 (R5); Rally3; Rally4 (R2); Rally5 (R1); S2000; Especificação Safari; WRC (Rally1); Outros
el: Κατηγορία αγώνων ράλι: Ομάδα A; Ομάδα B (ιστορικά); Ομάδα N; Ράλι ανάβασης; Ιστορικά; Open/Τροποποιημένα; Rally2 (R5); Rally3; Rally4 (R2); Rally5 (R1); S2000; Προδιαγραφές Safari; WRC (Rally1); Άλλο
bg-BG: Клас за рали състезания: Група A; Група B (исторически); Група N; Планинско рали; Исторически; Отворен/Модифициран; Рали2 (R5); Рали3; Рали4 (R2); Рали5 (R1); S2000; Спецификация Сафари; WRC (Рали1); Други
vi: Hạng mục thi đấu xe đua: Group A; Group B (cổ điển); Group N; Đua rally leo đồi; Cổ điển; Mở/Đã tùy chỉnh; Rally2 (R5); Rally3; Rally4 (R2); Rally5 (R1); S2000; Thông số Safari; WRC (Rally1); Khác
ro-RO: Clasa de competiție de raliu: Grupa A; Grupa B (istoric); Grupa N; Raliu de coastă; Istoric; Open/Modificat; Rally2 (R5); Rally3; Rally4 (R2); Rally5 (R1); S2000; Specificație Safari; WRC (Rally1); Altele